sv: Tillbehörets konsistens: Grov; Finhackad; Slätpuréad; Slät; Tjock; Tunn; Annan
pt-PT: Textura do condimento: Com pedaços; Picado; Em puré; Suave; Espesso; Fino; Outra
vi: Kết cấu gia vị: Có hạt to; Băm nhỏ; Xay nhuyễn; Mịn; Đặc; Loãng; Khác
zh-TW: 調味品質地: 帶顆粒; 碎末狀; 泥狀; 滑順; 濃稠; 偏稀; 其他
hu: Fűszer textúrája: Darabos; Darált; Pürésített; Sima; Sűrű; Híg; Egyéb
sk-SK: Textúra ochucovadla: S kúskami; Mletá; Prepasírovaná; Hladká; Hustá; Riedka; Iné
da: Krydderiets tekstur: Grov; Hakket; Puréret; Glat; Tyk; Tynd; Anden
ja: 調味料の質感: チャンキー; みじん切り; ピューレ; なめらか; とろみのある; さらさらした; その他
lt-LT: Pagardo tekstūra: Su gabaliukais; Smulkintas; Trintas; Vientisas; Tirštas; Skystas; Kita
fr: Consistance du condiment: Avec morceaux; Émincé; En purée; Lisse; Épais; Fluide; Autre
ko: 조미 식품 질감: 덩어리진; 다진; 퓌레; 부드러운; 걸쭉한; 묽은; 기타
th: เนื้อสัมผัสของเครื่องปรุง: ชิ้นหยาบ; สับ; บดละเอียด; เนื้อเนียน; ข้น; ใส; อื่นๆ
es: Textura del condimento: Con trozos; Picado; En puré; Suave; Espesa; Fina; Otra
cs: Textura koření: S kousky; Mletá; Pyré; Hladká; Hustá; Řídká; Jiné
fi: Mausteen rakenne: Karkea; Hienonnettu; Soseutettu; Sileä; Paksu; Juokseva; Muu
en: Condiment texture: Chunky; Minced; Puréed; Smooth; Thick; Thin; Other
bg-BG: Текстура на подправка/сос: На парченца; Смляна; Пюрирана; Гладка; Гъста; Рядка; Друга
pt-BR: Textura do condimento: Com pedaços; Picado; Purê; Homogênea; Espessa; Fina; Outro
nl: Specerij textuur: Met stukjes; Fijngehakt; Gepureerd; Glad; Dik; Dun; Overig
el: Υφή καρυκεύματος: Με κομμάτια; Ψιλοκομμένο; Πολτοποιημένο; Λείο; Παχύρρευστο; Λεπτόρρευστο; Άλλο
de: Textur des Würzmittels: Stückig; Gehackt; Püriert; Glatt; Dickflüssig; Dünnflüssig; Sonstige
zh-CN: 酱料质地: 块状; 碎末状; 泥状; 细腻; 浓稠; 稀薄; 其他
it: Consistenza del condimento: A pezzettoni; Tritato; In purea; Liscio; Denso; Liquido; Altro
ro-RO: Textura condimentului: Cu bucăți; Tocată; Piure; Fin; Dens; Subțire; Altele
hr-HR: Tekstura začina: S komadićima; Mljeveno; Pasirano; Glatko; Gusto; Rijetko; Ostalo
ru: Текстура приправы: С кусочками; Измельченная; Пюреобразная; Однородная; Густая; Жидкая; Другое
pl: Tekstura przyprawy/sosu: Z kawałkami; Drobno posiekana; Przetarta; Gładka; Gęsta; Rzadka; Inna
tr: Çeşni dokusu: İri taneli; Kıyılmış; Püre; Pürüzsüz; Kıvamlı; Akışkan; Diğer
sl-SI: Tekstura začimb: S koščki; Zmleto; Pretlačeno; Gladko; Gosto; Redko; Drugo
nb: Kryddertekstur: Med biter; Finhakket; Most; Glatt; Tykk; Tynn; Annet